Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,130
Health care coverages or services; defined.

For purposes of sections 44-3,129 to 44-3,131, health care coverages or services shall mean any services rendered for a fee which are included in the furnishing to any individual of medical care, or other services incident to the furnishing of such care, as well as the furnishing to any person of any and all other services for the purpose of preventing, alleviating, curing, or healing human illness or injury.

Laws 1986, LB 895, § 2.